District of Columbia statutes.
42-1311

Duty imposed on transferor only.

The duty to comply with this chapter is imposed on a transferor, and not on any real estate agent or real estate broker of a transferor. A real estate agent or real estate broker of a transferor shall not be liable for any error, inaccuracy or omission in any information delivered to any prospective transferee, or for any failure of a transferor to deliver any information or a real property disclosure statement to the prospective transferee, or for any violation of this chapter by a transferor, unless such real estate agent or real estate broker knowingly acts in concert with such transferor to commit fraud.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-263, § 12, 46 DCR 2111

History

1981 Ed., § 45-961.

Prior Codifications